Mississippi, session 2026, HB716.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 9-7-26, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 9-7-26.  (1)  The Chief Justice of the Supreme Court shall appoint four (4) temporary special circuit judges for the Seventh Circuit Court District.  No limitation whatsoever shall be placed upon the powers and duties of the judges other than those provided by the Constitution and laws of this state.  The term of the temporary special circuit judges shall expire on December 31, * * *2026 2029. (2)  The judges shall be appointed no later than fifteen (15) days after July 1, 2023, according to applicable state laws.  The Chief Justice of the Supreme Court may elect to reappoint circuit judges that are serving on a temporary basis as of July 1, 2023, in the Seventh Circuit Court District. (3)  (a)  Each temporary special circuit judge shall receive an office operating allowance to be used for the purposes described and in amounts equal to those authorized in Section 9-1-36. (b)  The Administrative Office of Courts shall establish personnel policies to compensate the support staff for each temporary special circuit judge. (4)  This section shall stand repealed on December 31, * * *2026 2029. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.